Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5875YH (2) 91 lh/ns H.F. 2388 Section 1. Section 22.7, subsection 11, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) The last date the individual, 3 who resigned from or was discharged by the government body, 4 performed work or actively carried out essential functions 5 of the position, regardless of whether the information is 6 contained in a written document, contract, agreement, or 7 arrangement. 8 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) The reasons a government body 9 terminated a contract, at-will employment, or engagement with 10 the individual, including the specific details of any alleged 11 misconduct or breach of contract by the individual, regardless 12 of whether the information is contained in a written document, 13 contract, agreement, or arrangement. 14 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (8) The amount of moneys and public 15 benefits provided to the individual for any continuation of 16 pay, severance, or other compensation or benefits in excess of 17 the amounts owed for work performed by the individual prior 18 to the individualâs last day as an employee, contractor, or 19 appointee for the government body, regardless of whether the 20 information is contained in a written document, contract, 21 agreement, or arrangement. 22